test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-redzeet_gt-norm.yaml
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: raciens
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: raciena
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: racienam
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: racienu
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: racienā
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: [raciens, racien]
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: racieni
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: racienu
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: racieniem
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: racienus
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: racienos
#     redzēt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Voc: racieni

     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2: redzot
     redzēt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2: redzam
     redzēt+V+TV+Cond: redzētu
     redzēt+V+TV+Deb+Quo: jāredzot
